src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ================== !
!! # Verb morphology 
! ================== !

!LEXICON sx ! this is an ad hoc lexicon waiting for classification.
!s1 ;

LEXICON s1
!! **@LEXNAME@** nevna = riggar!
               	standard_ir ; ! Verbal forms
			 	p7          ; ! Adjectival forms


LEXICON s2
!! **@LEXNAME@** keypa = riggar!
  				standard_ir_t 	;
 			:t  p39           	;

LEXICON SETA
!! **@LEXNAME@** seta = riggar!

 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg: urPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: urPass  ;
                 s2 	 ;


LEXICON s3
!! **@LEXNAME@** leiða = riggar!
               	standard_ir ;
			 	p7         ;

LEXICON s4
!! **@LEXNAME@** frøa = riggar!
               inf        ;
               pres_ir    ;
               prt_dd     ;
               imp_prsptc ;
               sup_tt     ;
 			   p18        ;

LEXICON s5
!! **@LEXNAME@** senda = riggar!
               standard_ir ;
 			   p1          ;

LEXICON s6
!! **@LEXNAME@** hirða = riggar!
               standard_ir ;
			   p7          ;

LEXICON s7
!! **@LEXNAME@** gista = riggar!
  				standard_ir_t ;
  				p5pos           ;


LEXICON s8
!! **@LEXNAME@** kenna = riggar!
               standard_ir ;
			   p7          ;

LEXICON s9
!! **@LEXNAME@** klippa = riggar!
			  	standard_ir_t ;
  			:%>t	p5            ;


LEXICON s10
!! **@LEXNAME@** fylgja = riggar!
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_d      ;
			   p7         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;

LEXICON s11 !
!! **@LEXNAME@**  roykja = riggar!
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_t      ;
 		  :t   p5         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;


LEXICON s12 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** boyggja = riggar!
               jinf       ;
               pres_ir_sg ;
          :j   pres_pl    ;
               sup        ;
               prt_d      ;
			   p7         ;
               imp        ;
          :j   prsptc     ;


LEXICON s13 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** søkkja = riggar!
    jinf       ;
    pres_ir_sg ;
 :j pres_pl    ;
    sup_t      ;
    prt_t      ;
 :%>t p5pos         ;
    imp        ;
 :j prsptc     ;


LEXICON s14 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** heingja = riggar!
                    jinf       ;
          :%^EIO    jinf       ;
                    pres_ir_sg ;
          :%^EIO    pres_ir_sg ;
          :j        pres_pl    ;
          :%^EIO%>j pres_pl    ;
          :%^EIO    prt_d      ;
          :%^EIO    imp        ;
                    imppl      ;
          :%^EIO    sup        ;
		  :%^EIO 	p7         ;
          :j        prsptc     ;
          :%^EIO%>j prsptc     ;


LEXICON s15 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** skeinkja = riggar!
           jinf       ;
 :%^EIO    jinf       ;
           pres_ir_sg ;
 :%^EIO    pres_ir_sg ;
 :j        pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO%>j pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO    prt_t      ;
 :%^EIO    imp        ;
           imppl      ;
 :%^EIO    sup_t      ;
 :%^EIO%>t p5pos         ;
 :j        prsptc     ;
 :%^EIO%>j prsptc     ;

LEXICON s15_2 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** steikja = riggar!
        	jinf       ;
        	pres_ir_sg ;
 :j     	pres_pl    ;
 :%^EIO 	prt_t      ;
        	imp        ;
 :%^EIO 	sup_t      ;
 :%^EIO%>t 	p5         ;
 :j     	prsptc     ;

LEXICON s16 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** flekja = riggar!
        jinf       ;
        pres_ir_sg ;
 :j     pres_pl    ;
 :%^WVV prt_d      ;
        imp        ;
 :j     prsptc     ;
 :%^WVV sup        ;
 :%^WVV%>t p5pos      ;

LEXICON s17 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** berja = riggar!
                 jinf     ;
                 pres_jir ;
          :%^WVV prt_d    ;
          :j     impsg    ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #     ;
          :j     prsptc   ;
          :%^WVV sup      ;
          :%^WVV p7       ;

LEXICON s18 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** krevja = riggar!
                 jinf      ;
                 pres_ur_j ;
          :%^WVV prt_d     ;
                 impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #      ;
          :j     prsptc    ;
          :%^WVV sup       ;
          :%^WVV p7        ;

LEXICON s19 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** dylja = riggar!
                 jinf      ;
                 pres_ur_j ;
          :%^WVV prt_d     ;
          :      impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið   #      ;
          :j     prsptc    ;
          :%^WVV sup       ;
          :%^WVV p7        ;

LEXICON s20 
!! **@LEXNAME@** leggja = riggar!
 :egg  jinf       ;
 :egg  pres_ur_j2 ;
 :eg   prt_ði     ;
 :øg   prt_du     ;
 :egg  imp        ;
 :eggj prsptc     ;
 :ag   sup        ;
 :ag   p8         ;

LEXICON s21 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** selja = riggar!
               jinf      ;
               pres_ur_j ;
          :    prt_d     ;
          :    impsg     ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jið #      ;
          :j   prsptc    ;
          :    sup       ;
               p7        ;

LEXICON s22 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** ryðja = riggar ikki í sup og prfptc!
 :      jinf       ;
 :      pres_ur_j2 ;
 :%^WVV prt_d      ;
 :      imp        ;
 :j     prsptc     ;
 :%^WVV sup_t     ;
 :%^WVV p18        ;

LEXICON s22_1 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** ýðja = riggar!
 :ýð  jinf       ;
 :ýð  pres_ur_j2 ;
 :ýð  pres_ir_j2 ;
 :u   prt_dd     ;
 :ý   prt_dd     ;
 :ýð  imp        ;
 :ýðj prsptc     ;
 :u   sup_tt     ;
 :ý   sup_tt     ;
 :u	  p18        ;
 :ý	  p18		 ;
 
LEXICON s23 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** smyrja = riggar!
               :yr     jinf    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>yrji Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>yr   Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>yr   tPass   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>yr   Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>yrja Pass    ;
               :ur     prt_d   ;
               :yr     impsg   ;
               :yrj    imppl_j ;
               :yrj    prsptc  ;
               :ur     sup     ;
               :ur     p7      ;

LEXICON s24 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** flysa = riggar ikki í pass!
        	inf        ;
        	pres_ur    ;
 :%^WVV 	prt_d      ;
        	imp_prsptc ;
 :%^WVV 	sup        ;
 :%^WVV%>t  p5pos         ;

LEXICON s25 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** liva = riggar!
               inf        ;
               pres_ir    ;
               prt_d      ;
               imp_prsptc ;
               sup_a      ;
 		   :að p6         ;
 		   :d  p6         ;


LEXICON s26 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** plaga = riggar (formurin plagdur manglar)!
             inf     ;
             pres_ar ;
             prt_d   ;
             sup     ;
 +V+Sup:%>að #       ;



LEXICON s26_1 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** mála->máldi
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_d      ;
             imp_prsptc ;
             sup        ;
 +V+Sup:%>að #          ;
 	   :að   p6         ;

LEXICON s27
!! **@LEXNAME@** spáa = riggar!
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_dd     ;
             imp_prsptc ;
 +V+Imp+Sg:a #       ;
             sup_tt     ;
             p18        ;

LEXICON s28 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** skaða = riggar ikki í prfptc!
  inf        ;
  pres_ar    ;
  prt_d      ;
  imp_prsptc ;
  sup        ;
  p18        ;

LEXICON s29 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** brúka = riggar!
             inf        ;
             pres_ar    ;
             prt_d      ;
             imp_prsptc ;
 +V+Imp+Sg:a #          ;
             sup        ;
          :t p5         ;

LEXICON s3/30
!! **@LEXNAME@** for double inflection pattern
s3 ; ! including +Inf
s30_infl ; ! excluding +Inf

LEXICON s30 
!! **@LEXNAME@** kalla = riggar!
     inf     ;
     s30_infl ;

LEXICON s30_infl
!! **@LEXNAME@** brúka = riggar!
     pres_ar ;
     prt_a   ;
 :a  impsg   ; !deviant kalla
     imppl   ;
     prsptc  ;
     sup_a   ;
 :a p6      ;

LEXICON s31 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** only gera and *gera = riggar!
               :er    inf        ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>eri Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ert Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>er  Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>er  Pass       ;
               :er    pres_pl    ;
               :er    imp_prsptc ;
               :jør   prt_d      ;
               :jør   sup        ;
               :jør   p7         ;
               
