src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
útflyta:út#flyt s24 ;
innflyta:inn#flyt s24 ;
útbyggja:út#bygg s12 ;
tilteinkja:til#teink s15 ;
forfylgja:for#fylg s10 ;
messingleggja:messingl s20 ;
falda:fald s30 ;
algilda:al#gild s5 ;
benda:bend s5 ;
lenda:lend s5 ;
senda:send s5 ;
boðsenda:boð#send s5 ;
skákvenda:skákvend s5 ;
plaga:plag s26 ;
hundleggja:hundl s20 ;
kromleggja:kroml s20 ;
súrleggja:súrl s20 ;
bíleggja:bíl s20 ;
byggja:bygg s12 ;
skyggja:skygg s12 ;
floyggja:floygg s12 ;
toyggja:toygg s12 ;
ryggja:rygg s12 ;
belgja:belg s10 ;
fylgja:fylg s10 ;
svølgja:svølg s10 ;
heingja:heing s14 ;
fleingja:fleing s14 ;
húðfleingja:húðfleing s14 ;
framleingja:framleing s14 ;
spreingja:spreing s14 ;
teingja:teing s14 ;
tyngja:tyng s10 ;
fyribyrgja:fyri#byrg s10 ;
klekja:klek s16 ;
rekja:rek s16 ;
tekja:tek s16 ;
hálmtekja:hálmtek s16 ;
súðtekja:súðtek s16 ;
turrsleikja:turrsleik s15_2;
veikja:veik s11 ;
rekkja:rekk s13 ;
trekkja:trekk s13 ;
klikkja:klikk s13 ;
knykkja:knykk s13 ;
samtykkja:sam#tykk s13 ;
hvøkkja:hvøkk s13 ;
hylkja:hylk s11 ;
skeinkja:skeink s15 ;
leinkja:leink s15 ;
kreinkja:kreink s15 ;
teinkja:teink s15 ;
illteinkja:illteink s15 ;
frámerkja:frá#merk s11 ;
meskja:mesk s11 ;
køkja:køk s11 ;
eydmýkja:eydmýk s11 ;
fíntelja:fíntel s18 ;
velja:vel s18 ;
hylja:hyl s19 ;
avhylja:avhyl s19 ;
kylja:kyl s10 ;
mylja:myl s19 ;
gremja:grem s18 ;
ymja:ym s19 ;
rymja:rym s19 ;
tenja:ten s18 ;
berja:ber s17 ;
húðberja:húðber s17 ;
merja:mer s17 ;
verja:ver s17 ;
smyrja:sm s23 ;
spyrja:sp s23 ;
sannspyrja:sann#sp s23 ;
tráspyrja:trá#sp s23 ;
krevja:krev s18 ;
svevja:svev s17 ;
yðja:yð s22 ; ! do ýðja irregular
ryðja:ryð s22 ;
bryðja:bryð s22 ;
gryðja:gryð s22 ;
skryðja:skryð s22 ;
prikka:prikk s30 ;
skáksigla:skáksigl s1 ;
feila:feil s29 ;
fossfella:fossfell s8 ;
hella:hell s8 ;
skella:skell s8 ;
vella:vell s8 ;
fylla:fyll s9 ;
trylla:tryll s9 ;
kumla:kuml s30 ;
grima:grim s1 ;
próvdøma:próv#døm s1 ;
kenna:kenn s8 ;
navnkenna:navn#kenn s8 ;
sólbrenna:sólbrenn s8 ;
stinna:stinn s9 ;
mona:mon s30 ;
stevna:stevn s1 ;
hjálpa:hjálp s2 ;
snøggklippa:snøgg#klipp s9 ;
groypa:groyp s2 ;
spara:spar s1 ;
gera+v1:g s31 ; ! only gera and *gera = riggar!
fullgera:fullg s31 ;
endurgera:endurg s31 ;
matgera:matg s31 ;
viðgera:við#g s31 ;
lútviðgera:lútviðg s31 ;
sukra:sukr s30 ;
stílføra:stílfør s1 ;
flysa:flys s24 ;
tysa:tys s24 ;
fræsa:fræs s2 ;
undirmeta:undir#met s2 ;
skifta:skift s7 ;
grifta:grift s30 ;
elta:elt s7 ;
grasvelta:grasvelt s9 ;
birta:birt s7 ;
lógfesta:lóg#fest s7 ;
krossfesta:kross#fest s7 ;
jarðfesta:jarð#fest s7 ;
djúpfrysta:djúp#fryst s7 ;
hitta:hitt s9 ;
flyta:flyt s24 ;
javnflyta:javnflyt s24 ;
skoyta:skoyt s2 ;
óðalsbýta:óðals#být s2 ;
liva:liv s25 ;
yvirliva:yvir#liv s25 ;
uppliva:upp#liv s25 ;
doya:doy s4 ;
stroya:stroy s4 ;
sandstroya:sandstroy s4 ;
saltstroya:saltstroy s4 ;
forsmáa:for#smá s27 ;
spáa:spá s27 ;
flæa:flæ s4 ;
skaða:skað s28 ;
beiða:beið s3 ;
eygleiða:eygleið s3 ;
greiða:greið s3 ;
troða:troð s28 ;
herða:herð s6 ;
forherða:for#herð s6 ;
girða:girð s6 ;
hirða:hirð s6 ;
vanvirða:vanvirð s6 ;
misvirða:misvirð s6 ;
myrða:myrð s6 ;
klæða:klæð s3 ;
øða:øð s3 ;
avmøða:avmøð s3 ;
misprýða:misprýð s3 ;
gløa:glø s4 ;
frøa:frø s4 ;
bannseta:bannset SETA ;
bata:bat s29 ;
dagseta:dagset SETA ;
dvølja:dvøl s21 ;
einskilja:einskil s21 ;
gáa:gá s27 ;
hvørviskilja:hvørviskil s21 ;
innseta:innset SETA ;
ísáa:ísá s27 ;
kæra:kær s1 ;
kappsleikja:kappsleik s15_2;
kjósa:kjós s29 ;
króseta:króset SETA ;
kvetta:kvett s9 ;
mála:mál s26_1 ;
markskilja:mark#skil s21 ;
ovsteikja:ov#steik s15_2;
raðsáa:raðsá s27 ;
ræla:ræl s2 ;
raka:rak s29 ;
ringa:ring s5 ;
riststeikja:riststeik s15_2;
rúma:rúm s29 ;
sáa:sá s27 ;
sjóseta:sjóset SETA ;
skilja:skil s21 ;
sleikja:sleik s15_2;
smíða:smíð s28 ;
stavseta:stav#set SETA ;
steikja:steik s15_2;
stynja:styn s19 ;
sveipa:sveip s29 ;
svíkja:svík s11 ;
tíma:tím s25 ;
tola:tol s25 ;
tora:tor s25 ;
úrskilja:úrskil s21 ;
vanyrða:vanyrð s3/30 ;
vekja:vek s18 ;
vekja:vek s16 ;
ýðja: s22_1 ;
ýva:ýv s1 ;
forseta:for#set SETA ;
planleggja:plan#l s20 ;
